Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB720.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1402(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1402. Health Services.--(a) Each child of school age shall be given by methods established by the Advisory Health Board, (1) a hearing test by a school nurse or medical technician, (1.1) a vision screening by school health personnel or a vision screener or an eye health and vision examination by an ophthalmologist or optometrist, and (2) a measurement of height and weight by a school nurse or teacher, who shall use <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 the measurement to compute a child's weight-for-height ratio[, (3) tests for tuberculosis under medical supervision, and (4) such other tests as the Advisory Health Board may deem advisable to protect the health of the child]. A vision screening or an eye health and vision examination shall be performed on an annual basis.* * *Section 2. Section 1403.1(a)(1) and (2), (b)(1) and (2) and (d) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), are amended to read:Section 1403.1. Vision Screening and Examinations.--(a) (1) Prior to admission to school for the first time, a parent or legal guardian shall present to the school entity or nonpublic school certification from [a primary care provider or vision screener that the child has passed or failed a vision screening performed by a primary care provider or a vision screening conducted by screeners with specific training in vision screening techniques and protocols approved by the Department of Health or has completed] an ophthalmologist or optometrist that the child has passed or failed a comprehensive eye health and vision exam conducted by an ophthalmologist or optometrist within the previous twelve months.(2) The Department of Health shall promulgate regulations to establish vision screening standards based on instrument-based vision screening technologies or visual acuity testing, taking into consideration national guidelines from the American Academy of Pediatrics, American Optometric Association and American Association for Pediatric Ophthalmology and Strabismus.* * *(b) (1) [Every] Except as provided under section 1403.2, 20250SB0720PN1802 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 every school year at a school entity or nonpublic school, until a child completes the fifth grade and at least every two years thereafter until the child graduates from the twelfth grade, the child shall have a vision screening performed by school health personnel or screeners with specific training in vision screening techniques and protocols approved by the Department of Health. The results of the vision screening shall be supplied to the parent or legal guardian of the child.(2) For a child who fails a required vision screening, a comprehensive eye health and vision examination, performed by an ophthalmologist or optometrist, shall also be required. Notification of the parent or legal guardian of the failed screening shall be accompanied by notification of requirement for a comprehensive eye health and vision examination that must be completed within one hundred twenty (120) days or before the start of the next school year, whichever comes first, and a list of vision resources compiled by the Department of Health. Notification may also include a form, to be completed by the examining ophthalmologist or optometrist, to be used for reporting the results of the examination. The report may include, but not be limited to, the following:(i) Date of report.(ii) Name, address and date of birth of the child.(iii) Name of the child's school.(iv) A summary of significant findings, including best corrected visual acuity, diagnosis, treatment, prognosis and whether or not a return visit is recommended and, if so, when.(v) Recommended educational adjustments for the child, if any, which may include preferential seating in the classroom, eyeglasses for full-time use in school, eyeglasses for part-time 20250SB0720PN1802 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 use in school, sight-saving eyeglasses or any other recommendations.(vi) Name, address and signature of the examiner.* * *(d) A school entity or nonpublic school shall not be required to provide comprehensive eye health and vision examinations or held financially responsible for the treatment of a child who fails the required vision screening.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1403.2. Eye Health and Vision Examinations.--(a) Except as provided under subsections (c) and (e), children of school age in this Commonwealth shall be given an eye health and vision examination:(1) upon admission to school; (2) while in the fourth grade; (3) while in the eighth grade; (4) as part of the evaluation of and prior to the student becoming subject to 29 U.S.C. § 794 (relating to nondiscrimination under Federal grants and programs); and(5) as part of the evaluation of and prior to the student's enrollment in a Title I reading program as defined by 20 U.S.C. Ch. 70 Subch. I (relating to improving the academic achievement of the disadvantaged).(b) A school district or joint school board that institutes an eye health and vision examination program under subsection (c) shall be exempt from providing eye health and vision examinations as required under subsection (a).(c) A school district or joint school board may institute an eye health and vision examination program for children of school 20250SB0720PN1802 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 age. Before a school district or joint school board institutes an eye health and vision examination program under this subsection, the program shall be approved by the Secretary of Health.(d) The parent or guardian of a child of school age shall submit evidence that the child received an eye health and vision examination in accordance with subsection (a).(e) This section shall apply to a child who is enrolled in a public or nonpublic school.(f) As used in this section, the term "eye health and vision examination" means an evaluation performed by an ophthalmologist or optometrist that includes all of the following:(1) An evaluation of vision history. (2) An external and internal ophthalmic examination. (3) An assessment of vision acuity, ocular alignment and motility and refraction.(4) An assessment of accommodation and binocular vision. Section 4. Section 1407 of the act is amended to read:Section 1407. Examinations by Examiners of Own Choice.--In lieu of the medical or dental examinations prescribed by this article, any child of school age may furnish the local school officials with a medical or dental report of examination made at his own expense by his family physician [or], family dentist, ophthalmologist or optometrist on a form approved by the Secretary of Health for this purpose. The in lieu examinations shall be made and the report shall be furnished prior to the date fixed for the regularly scheduled examination but no earlier than four months prior to the opening of the school term during which the regular examination is scheduled.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0720PN1802 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1403.2. INITIAL VISION EXAMINATION.--(A) A CHILD ENTERING SCHOOL FOR THE FIRST TIME IN THIS COMMONWEALTH MUST HAVE A COMPREHENSIVE EYE EXAMINATION PERFORMED BY AN OPHTHALMOLOGIST OR OPTOMETRIST WITHIN ONE YEAR PRIOR TO THE START OF SCHOOL OR WITHIN ONE HUNDRED TWENTY (120) DAYS AFTER THE START OF THE SCHOOL YEAR.(B) A CHILD WHO IS IDENTIFIED WITH DISABILITIES AND BEGINS RECEIVING INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT SERVICES FOR THE FIRST TIME UNDER AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER 22 PA. CODE CH. 14 (RELATING TO SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES AND PROGRAMS) OR A 504 SERVICE AGREEMENT UNDER SECTION 504 OF THE REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973 (PUBLIC LAW 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 794) AND 22 PA. CODE CH. 15 (RELATING TO PROTECTED HANDICAPPED STUDENTS) MUST HAVE A COMPREHENSIVE EYE EXAMINATION PERFORMED BY AN OPHTHALMOLOGIST OR OPTOMETRIST.(C) NOTIFICATION TO THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A CHILD UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR (B) SHALL INCLUDE THE REQUIREMENT FOR A COMPREHENSIVE EYE EXAMINATION TO BE COMPLETED WITHIN ONE HUNDRED TWENTY (120) DAYS OR BEFORE THE START OF THE NEXT SCHOOL YEAR, WHICHEVER COMES FIRST, AND A LIST OF VISION RESOURCES COMPILED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. NOTIFICATION MAY INCLUDE A FORM, TO BE COMPLETED BY THE EXAMINING OPHTHALMOLOGIST OR OPTOMETRIST, TO BE USED FOR REPORTING THE RESULTS OF THE EXAMINATION. THE REPORT MAY INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(1) DATE OF REPORT.(2) NAME, ADDRESS AND DATE OF BIRTH OF THE CHILD.(3) NAME OF THE CHILD'S SCHOOL.20250SB0720PN1802 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT FINDINGS, INCLUDING BEST CORRECTED VISUAL ACUITY, DIAGNOSIS, TREATMENT, PROGNOSIS AND WHETHER OR NOT A RETURN VISIT IS RECOMMENDED AND, IF SO, WHEN.(5) RECOMMENDED EDUCATIONAL ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE CHILD, IF ANY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE PREFERENTIAL SEATING IN THE CLASSROOM, EYEGLASSES FOR FULL-TIME USE IN SCHOOL, EYEGLASSES FOR PART-TIME USE IN SCHOOL, SIGHT-SAVING EYEGLASSES OR ANY OTHER RECOMMENDATIONS.(6) NAME, ADDRESS AND SIGNATURE OF THE EXAMINER.(D) THE EXAMINATION REPORT MAY BE ACCOMPANIED BY AN ENVELOPE FOR RETURN OF THE FORM TO SCHOOL PERSONNEL SO THE COMPLETION STATUS AND RESULT OF THE EXAMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) MAY BE RECORDED AND CONSIDERED AS PART OF THE INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT PLANNING PROCESS FOR THE STUDENT.(E) A CHILD MAY NOT BE PROHIBITED FROM ATTENDING SCHOOL OR INITIATING, RECEIVING OR CONTINUING TO RECEIVE SERVICES PRESCRIBED IN THE STUDENT'S INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM FOR THE REASON THAT THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN FAILED TO FURNISH A REPORT OF THE CHILD'S VISION EXAMINATION OR TO HAVE AN EXAMINATION COMPLETED.(F) A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE EYE EXAMINATIONS OR BE HELD FINANCIALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR AN EYE EXAMINATION REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION.(G) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"NONPUBLIC SCHOOL." A SCHOOL, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC SCHOOL WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH, IN WHICH A RESIDENT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH MAY LEGALLY FULFILL THE COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND WHICH MEETS THE 20250SB0720PN1802 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE VI OF THE CIVIL RIGHTS ACT OF 1964 (PUBLIC LAW 88-352, 78 STAT. 241 ????)."SCHOOL ENTITY." A SCHOOL DISTRICT, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, INTERMEDIATE UNIT OR AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0720PN1802 - 8 - 123456